lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/xal/rules.xfst
read lexc lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;
define Cleanup0 "+" -> 0;
define Cleanup1 "}"-> 0;
define Cleanup2 "{"-> 0;
define Cleanup3 "^"-> 0;
define Cleanup4 "@"-> 0;
define Cleanup5 "$"-> 0;
define Cleanup6 "ɛ"-> 0;
define Cleanup7 "€"-> 0;
define Cleanup8 "ꙧ"-> 0;
define Cleanup9 "ß"-> 0;


define SoftVowels  [ и | ү | ә | е | ө | э | е ];

define HardVowels  [ и | у | а | я | о | ю ];
define BLVowels [ у | о | а ];
define Vowels [ SoftVowels | HardVowels ];
